Washington statutes.
RCW 4.48.090

Judgment on referee's report.

The court may affirm or set aside the report of a referee appointed under RCW 4.48.020 either in whole or in part. If it affirms the report it shall give judgment accordingly. If the report be set aside, either in whole or in part, the court may make another order of reference as to all or so much of the report as is set aside, to the original referees or others, or it may find the facts and determine the law itself and give judgment accordingly. Upon a motion to set aside a report, the conclusions thereof shall be deemed and considered as the verdict of the jury.

[ 1984 c 258 s 520; Code 1881 s 256; 1877 p 52 s 260; 1869 p 62 s 260; RRS s 377.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.